Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.70, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Grants to organizations. (a) The Division of Social Equity must award grants to eligible organizations through a competitive grant process. (b) To receive grant money, an eligible organization must submit a written application to the office, using a form developed by the office, explaining the community investment the organization wants to make in an eligible community. (c) An eligible organization's grant application must also include: (1) an analysis of the community's need for the proposed investment; (2) a description of the positive impact that the proposed investment is expected to generate for that community; (3) any evidence of the organization's ability to successfully achieve that positive impact; (4) any evidence of the organization's past success in making similar community investments; (5) an estimate of the cost of the proposed investment; (6) the sources and amounts of any nonstate funds or in-kind contributions that will supplement grant money; (7) a description of the organization's engagement with youth-centered, community-based organizations working with youth who are 14 to 24 years of age that have been most impacted by cannabis-related usage, criminalization, or incarceration; and (8) any additional information requested by the office. (d) In awarding grants under this subdivision, the office shall give priority to the following: (1) applications from organizations that demonstrate a history of successful community investments, particularly in geographic areas that are now eligible communities; (2) applications that support youth civic engagement, leadership, and youth-led health education opportunities; and (3) applications where there is demonstrated community support for the proposed investment. (e) The office shall fund investments in eligible communities throughout the state. new text begin (f) At least 50 percent of the grants awarded each year under this subdivision must be for supporting youth civic engagement, leadership, and youth-led health education opportunities, with a preference for communities that have been most impacted by cannabis-related criminalization or incarceration. new text end